Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.42.320

Rules.

The director shall have power to adopt uniform rules to govern examination and reports of alien bank offices and bureaus doing business in this state pursuant to this chapter and the form in which they shall report their assets, liabilities, and reserves, charge off bad debts and otherwise keep their records and accounts and otherwise to govern the administration of this chapter.

[ 1994 c 92 s 102; 1973 1st ex.s. c 53 s 32. Formerly RCW 30.42.320.]